Utah statutes.
32A-12-310 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Forgery.

(1) (a)  Any person, with a purpose to defraud the commission or the department or with knowledge that he is facilitating a fraud to be perpetrated by anyone, who forges any writing required under this title, is guilty of forgery as provided under Section 76-6-501.

(b)  A violation of Subsection (1)(a) is a second degree felony.

(2)  Any person, with intent to defraud the commission or the department, who knowingly possesses any writing that is a forgery as defined in Section 76-6-501, is guilty of a third degree felony.

